Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-215
Acknowledgments of written instruments; savings and loan association; oath; authorized; prior acknowledgments validated.

It is lawful for any shareholder, director, employee, agent, or any elected or appointed officer of a savings and loan association, who is a notary public, (1) to take the acknowledgment of any person to any written instrument given to or by the savings and loan association and (2) to administer an oath to any other shareholder, director, officer, employee, or agent of the savings and loan association. Acknowledgments heretofore taken of any person to any written instrument given to or by a savings and loan association, or any oath administered to any shareholder, director, employee, agent, or elected or appointed officer of a savings and loan association by any notary public who was a shareholder, director, employee, agent, or any elected or appointed officer of the savings and loan association, shall be deemed to be lawful, valid, and binding.

Laws 1957, c. 315, § 1, p. 1132;

R.R.S.1943, § 76-217.05;

Laws 1976, LB 622, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 33.